Massachusetts, session 194th, H1895.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 239 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding, after section 14, the
following new section:-
Section 15. Two-tier process;
(a) All summary process cases shall be handled in a two-tier process. (i) First tier. This
event will be for the parties to determine the status of the case, explore the availability of
resources, attempt mediation or other opportunity to reach a resolution to the case, and identify
next steps in preparing the case for trial. No default or dismissal may enter if a party does not
appear at the first tier event. (ii) Second tier. For cases which are not resolved, the Clerk’s Office
shall send a written notice to the parties of the trial date.
of 1